Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Alternate Method of Selecting School Boards in School Divisions Comprised of a Single County.

§ 22.1-41.
Application of article.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable in any county constituting a school division except a county to which the provisions of §§

15.2-410

,

15.2-531

,

15.2-627

or §

15.2-837

are applicable.

History.

1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-42.
Referendum on changing method of selection of members of school board.

Upon a petition filed with the circuit court of any county to which the provisions of this article are applicable signed by a number of registered voters of the county equal to fifteen per centum of the number of votes cast in the county in the preceding presidential election asking that a referendum be held on the question of changing the method of selection of members of the county school board, the court shall, by order entered of record, require the regular election officials on the day fixed in such order to open the polls and take the sense of the qualified voters of the county on the question printed on the ballot as herein provided.
The clerk of the county shall cause a notice of such referendum to be published in some newspaper published or having a general circulation in the county once a week for three successive weeks prior to such referendum and shall post a copy of such notice during the same time at the front door of the courthouse of the county.

In lieu of such petition, the Board of Supervisors of Isle of Wight County or Roanoke County may cause to be passed a resolution requesting that such referendum be held; provided that prior to the passage of such resolution the Board of Supervisors shall hold a public hearing on the question of such referendum.
The resolution shall be filed with the circuit court and upon receipt thereof, the court shall proceed as in the case of a petition.

The ballots used in the referendum shall be printed as follows:

“Shall the present method of selecting the members of the county school board be changed from appointment by the School Board Selection Commission to appointment by the governing body of the county?

Yes
•

No
• ”

The ballots shall be counted, returns made and canvassed as in other elections, and the results certified by the electoral board to the State Board of Elections, the clerk of the county and the circuit court; and the court shall enter of record the results of such referendum.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-79.4; 1970, c. 126; 1975, cc. 517, 567; 1979, c. 10; 1980, c. 559; 1992, c. 354.

§ 22.1-43.
Abolition of school board selection commission.

If the majority of votes cast in the referendum held as provided in § 22.1-42 shall be for the proposition, the school board selection commission of the county shall be abolished. If the majority of the votes cast shall be against the proposition, the school board selection commission shall be retained.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-79.5; 1970, c. 126; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-44.
Appointment of school board members and tie breaker by county governing body; terms; vacancies.

If, in a referendum held as provided in § 22.1-42, it shall be determined that the members of the county school board shall be appointed by the governing body of the county, such governing body shall, by majority vote, thereafter appoint all members of the school board and the tie breaker, if any. Members of the school board and the tie breaker in office at the time of the referendum shall complete their terms and their successors shall be appointed by the governing body. The governing body shall determine whether the office of the tie breaker shall continue after the expiration of the term of the incumbent. Appointments of school board members and tie breakers, if any, shall be made at public meetings. The terms of office of the members of the county school board shall continue to be four years. Vacancies in the office of members of the county school board occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled by appointment by the governing body for the unexpired terms. The term of office of the tie breaker, if any, shall continue to be four years. Any appointment to fill a vacancy in the office of tie breaker, if any, whether or not by expiration of term, shall be for a four-year term.

The school board shall consist of the same number of members from each magisterial or election district as is provided in § 22.1-36. The governing body of the county may appoint no more than two additional members from the county at large.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-61, 22-79.1, 22-79.3; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 25; 1970, cc. 88, 126; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 225; 1972, c. 137; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 246.

§ 22.1-45.
Referendum to revert to appointment by school board selection commission.

Upon a petition (i) filed with the circuit court of any county which has changed the method of appointment of the members of the school board to appointment by the governing body as a result of a referendum as provided in this article or former §§ 22-79.1 through 22-79.6, (ii) signed by a number of registered voters of the county equal to fifteen per centum of the number of votes cast in the county in the preceding presidential election, and (iii) asking that a referendum be held on the question of changing the method of selection of members of the county school board, the court shall, by order entered of record, require the regular election officials on the day fixed in such order to open the polls and take the sense of the qualified voters of the county on the question printed on the ballot as herein provided. The clerk of the county shall cause a notice of such referendum to be published in some newspaper published or having a general circulation in the county once a week for three successive weeks prior to such referendum and shall post a copy of such notice during the same time at the front door of the courthouse of the county. The ballots used in such referendum shall be printed as follows:“Shall the present method of selecting the members of the county school board be changed from appointment by the governing body of the county to appointment by a school board selection commission?Yes •No • ”The ballots shall be counted, returns made and canvassed as in other elections, and the results certified by the electoral board to the State Board of Elections, the clerk of the county and the circuit court; and the court shall enter of record the results of such referendum.

If the majority of the votes cast in such referendum shall be for the proposition, a school board selection commission shall be appointed as provided in § 22.1-35 and the commission shall appoint the members of the county school board and the tie breaker as provided in Article 2 (§ 22.1-34 et seq.) of this chapter as the terms of the incumbents expire or as vacancies otherwise occur.If a majority of the votes cast in such referendum are against the proposition, the members of the school board and the tie breaker shall continue to be appointed by the governing body as provided in this article.

History.

1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-46.
Limitation on time of holding subsequent referendum.

Regardless of its results, following any referendum provided for in this article, no further such referendum shall be held within four years thereafter.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-79.6; 1970, c. 126; 1980, c. 559.